Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HCR2004.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona:
<<Section 1. Section 28-601, Arizona Revised Statutes,
is amended to read:
28-601. Definitions
In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "Commercial motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle or
combination of vehicles that is designed, used or maintained
to transport passengers or property in the furtherance of a
commercial enterprise, that is a commercial motor vehicle as
defined in section 28-5201 and that is not exempt from gross
weight fees as prescribed in section 28-5432, subsection B.
2. "Controlled access highway" means a highway, street
or roadway to or from which owners or occupants of abutting
lands and other persons have no legal right of access except
at such points only and in the manner determined by the public

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2004
authority that has jurisdiction over the highway, street or
roadway.
3. "Crosswalk" means:
(a) That part of a roadway at an intersection included
within the prolongations or connections of the lateral lines
of the sidewalks on opposite sides of the highway measured
from the curbs or, in absence of curbs, from the edges of the
traversable roadway.
(b) Any portion of a roadway at an intersection or
elsewhere that is distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing
by lines or other markings on the surface.
4. "Escort vehicle" means a vehicle that is required
pursuant to rules adopted by the department to escort motor
vehicles or combinations of vehicles that require issuance of
a permit pursuant to article 18 or 19 of this chapter for
operation on the highways of this state.
5. "Explosives" means any chemical compound, mixture or
device that is commonly used or intended for the purpose of
producing an explosion and that is defined in 49 Code of
Federal Regulations part 173.
6. "Flammable liquid" means any liquid that has a flash
point of less than one hundred degrees Fahrenheit and that is
defined in 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 173.120.
7. "Gross weight" means the weight of a vehicle without
a load plus the weight of any load on the vehicle.
8. "Intersection" means the area embraced within the
prolongation or connection of the lateral curb lines, or if
none, the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two
highways that join one another at, or approximately at, right
angles, or the area within which vehicles traveling on
different highways joining at any other angle may come in
conflict. If a highway includes two roadways thirty or more
feet apart, each crossing of each roadway of the divided
highway by an intersecting highway is a separate intersection.
If the intersecting highway also includes two roadways thirty
or more feet apart, each crossing of two roadways of the
highways is a separate intersection.
9. "License" means any license, temporary instruction
permit or temporary license issued under the laws of this
state or any other state that pertain to the licensing of
persons to operate motor vehicles.
10. "Low emission and energy efficient vehicle" means a
vehicle that has been certified by the United States
environmental protection agency administrator in accordance
with 23 United States Code section 166 or that is part of a
federally approved pilot program.
-2-

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2004
11. "Motorized wheelchair" means any self-propelled
wheelchair that is used by a person for mobility.
12. "Official traffic control device" means any sign,
signal, marking or device that is not inconsistent with this
chapter and that is placed or erected by authority of a public
body or official having jurisdiction for the purpose of
regulating, warning or guiding traffic.
13. "Park", if prohibited, means the standing of a
vehicle, whether occupied or not, otherwise than temporarily
for the purpose of and while actually engaged in loading or
unloading.
14. "Photo enforcement system" means a device
substantially consisting of a radar unit or sensor linked to a
camera or other recording device that produces one or more
photographs, microphotographs, videotapes or digital or other
recorded images of a vehicle's license plate for the purpose
of identifying violators of articles 3 and 6 of this chapter.
15. 14. "Pneumatic tire" means a tire in which
compressed air is designed to support the load.
16. 15. "Pole trailer" means a vehicle that is all of
the following:
(a) Without motive power.
(b) Designed to be drawn by another vehicle and
attached to the towing vehicle by means of a reach or pole or
by being boomed or otherwise secured to the towing vehicle.
(c) Used ordinarily for transporting long or
irregularly shaped loads such as poles, pipes or structural
members capable generally of sustaining themselves as beams
between the supporting connections.
17. 16. "Police officer" means an officer authorized
to direct or regulate traffic or make arrests for violations
of traffic rules or other offenses.
18. 17. "Private road or driveway" means a way or
place that is in private ownership and that is used for
vehicular travel by the owner and those persons who have
express or implied permission from the owner but not by other
persons.
19. 18. "Railroad" means a carrier of persons or
property on cars operated on stationary rails.
20. 19. "Railroad sign or signal" means a sign, signal
or device erected by authority of a public body or official or
by a railroad and intended to give notice of the presence of
railroad tracks or the approach of a railroad train.
21. 20. "Railroad train" means a steam engine or any
electric or other motor that is with or without cars coupled
to the steam engine or electric or other motor and that is
operated on rails.
-3-

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2004
22. 21. "Roadway" means that portion of a highway that
is improved, designed or ordinarily used for vehicular travel,
exclusive of the berm or shoulder. If a highway includes two
or more separate roadways, roadway refers to any such roadway
separately but not to all such roadways collectively.
23. 22. "Safety zone" means the area or space that is
both:
(a) Officially set apart within a roadway for the
exclusive use of pedestrians.
(b) Protected or either marked or indicated by adequate
signs as to be plainly visible at all times while set apart as
a safety zone.
24. 23. "Sidewalk" means that portion of a street that
is between the curb lines or the lateral lines of a roadway
and the adjacent property lines and that is intended for the
use of pedestrians.
25. 24. "Stop", if required, means complete cessation
from movement.
26. 25. "Stop, stopping or standing", if prohibited,
means any stopping or standing of an occupied or unoccupied
vehicle, except when necessary to avoid conflict with other
traffic or in compliance with directions of a police officer
or traffic control sign or signal.
27. 26. "Through highway" means a highway or portion
of a highway at the entrances to which vehicular traffic from
intersecting highways is required by law to stop before
entering or crossing and when stop signs are erected as
provided in this chapter.
28. 27. "Traffic" means pedestrians, ridden or herded
animals, vehicles and other conveyances either singly or
together while using a highway for purposes of travel.
29. 28. "Traffic control signal" means a device,
whether manually, electrically or mechanically operated, by
which traffic is alternately directed to stop and to proceed.
30. 29. "Truck" means a motor vehicle that is
designed, used or maintained primarily for the transportation
of property.>>
<<Sec. 2. Section 28-627, Arizona Revised Statutes, is
amended to read:
28-627. Powers of local authorities
A. This chapter and chapters 4 and 5 of this title do
not prohibit a local authority, with respect to streets and
highways under its jurisdiction and within the reasonable
exercise of the police power, from:
1. Regulating the standing or parking of vehicles.
2. Regulating traffic by means of police officers,
traffic control signals or volunteer posse organization
-4-

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2004
members authorized by the sheriff under section 11-441 for the
purpose of directing traffic only.
3. Regulating or prohibiting processions or assemblages
on the highways.
4. Designating particular highways as one-way highways
and requiring that all vehicles on one-way highways be moved
in one specific direction.
5. Regulating the speed of vehicles in public parks.
6. Designating any highway as a through highway and
requiring that all vehicles stop before entering or crossing
the highway or designating any intersection as a stop
intersection and requiring all vehicles to stop at one or more
entrances to the intersection.
7. Restricting the use of highways as authorized in
section 28-1106.
8. Regulating the operation of bicycles and requiring
the registration and licensing of bicycles, including the
requirement of a registration fee.
9. Regulating or prohibiting the turning of vehicles or
specified types of vehicles at intersections.
10. Altering the prima facie speed limits as authorized
by this chapter.
11. Designating routes over streets and highways for
vehicles not exceeding one hundred two inches in width,
exclusive of safety equipment.
12. Adopting other traffic regulations that are
specifically authorized by this chapter or chapter 4 or 5 of
this title.
13. Designating routes on certain streets and highways
for the purpose of allowing off-highway vehicle operators to
gain access to or from a designated off-highway recreation
facility as defined in section 28-1171, off-highway vehicle
trail as defined in section 28-1171 or off-highway vehicle
special event as defined in section 28-1171.
14. Regulating electric bicycles and electric standup
scooters. A local authority may consider the environmental
benefits and traffic benefits of electric bicycles and
electric standup scooters when regulating electric bicycles
and electric standup scooters.
B. A local authority shall not erect or maintain a stop
sign or traffic control signal at any location that requires
the traffic on any state highway to stop before entering or
crossing any intersecting highway unless approval in writing
has first been obtained from the director.
C. An ordinance or regulation enacted under subsection
A, paragraph 4, 5, 6, 7, 9 or 10 of this section is not
effective until signs giving notice of the local traffic
-5-

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2004
regulations are posted on or at the entrances to the highway
or part of the highway affected as is most appropriate.
D. The definition of motor vehicle prescribed in
section 28-101 does not prevent a local authority from
adopting ordinances that regulate or prohibit the operation of
motorized skateboards, except that a local authority shall not
adopt an ordinance that requires registration and licensing of
motorized skateboards. For the purposes of this subsection,
"motorized skateboard" means a self-propelled device that does
not have handlebars and that has a motor, a deck on which a
person may ride and at least two tandem wheels in contact with
the ground.
E. In addition to the appointment of peace officers, a
local authority may provide by ordinance for the appointment
of:
1. Unarmed police aides or municipally approved private
contractors who are employed or contracted by the police
department and who are empowered to commence an action or
proceeding before a court or judge for a violation of the
local authority's ordinances regulating the standing or
parking of vehicles. A municipally approved private
contractor shall not include a relative of an employee or of
an elected official of the municipality. The authority of the
unarmed police aide or municipally approved private contractor
as authorized in this section is limited to the enforcement of
the ordinances of local authorities regulating the standing or
parking of vehicles. Pursuant to rules established by the
supreme court, an unarmed police aide appointed pursuant to
this paragraph may serve any process originating out of a
municipal court in the municipality in which the unarmed
police aide is employed. Service of process under this
paragraph shall only be made during the hours the municipal
court is open for the transaction of business and only on
court premises. This paragraph does not grant to unarmed
police aides or municipally approved private contractors other
powers or benefits to which peace officers of this state are
entitled.
2. Traffic investigators who may:
(a) Investigate traffic accidents within the
jurisdiction of the local authority.
(b) Commence an action or proceeding before a court or
judge for any violation of a state statute or local ordinance
relating to traffic, if the violation is related to a traffic
accident within the jurisdiction of the local authority.
(c) Pursuant to rules established by the supreme court,
serve any process originating out of a municipal court in the
municipality in which the traffic investigator is employed.
-6-

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2004
Service of process under paragraph 1 of this subsection shall
only be made during the hours the municipal court is open for
the transaction of business and only on court premises.
F. A traffic investigator appointed pursuant to this
section shall:
1. Be unarmed at all times during the course of the
traffic investigator's duties.
2. Be an employee of the appointing local authority.
3. File written reports as required pursuant to section
28-667.
G. Notwithstanding subsection E of this section, an
unarmed police aide, a municipally approved private contractor
or a traffic investigator shall not serve any process
resulting from a citation issued for a violation of article 3
or 6 of this chapter or of a city or town ordinance for
excessive speed or failure to obey a traffic control device
that is obtained using a photo enforcement system.
H. G. This section does not grant other powers or
benefits to traffic investigators to which peace officers of
this state are entitled.
I. H. Pursuant to section 28-1092, a local authority
shall provide reasonable access to and from terminals and
service facilities on highways under its jurisdiction.>>
Section 1. Section 28-1201, Arizona Revised Statutes,
is amended to read:
28-1201. Definition of photo enforcement system
In this article, unless the context otherwise requires,
"photo enforcement system" has the same meaning prescribed in
section 28-601 MEANS A DEVICE SUBSTANTIALLY CONSISTING OF A
RADAR UNIT OR SENSOR LINKED TO A CAMERA OR OTHER RECORDING
DEVICE THAT PRODUCES ONE OR MORE PHOTOGRAPHS,
MICROPHOTOGRAPHS, VIDEOTAPES OR DIGITAL OR OTHER RECORDED
IMAGES OF A VEHICLE'S LICENSE PLATE FOR THE PURPOSE OF
IDENTIFYING VIOLATORS OF ARTICLE 3 OR 6 OF THIS CHAPTER OR OF
A CITY OR TOWN ORDINANCE FOR EXCESSIVE SPEED OR FAILURE TO
OBEY A TRAFFIC CONTROL DEVICE.
<<Sec. 4. Repeal
Sections 28-1202, 28-1203, 28-1204, 28-1205 and 28-1206,
Arizona Revised Statutes, are repealed.>>
Sec. 2. Title 28, chapter 3, article 21, Arizona
Revised Statutes, is amended by adding [a new] section
[28-1202] [28-1207], to read:
[28-1202.] [28-1207.] Photo enforcement system; voter
approval requirement
[A.] A LOCAL AUTHORITY OR AN AGENCY OF THIS STATE MAY
NOT USE A PHOTO ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM TO IDENTIFY VIOLATORS OF
ARTICLE 3 OR 6 OF THIS CHAPTER OR OF A CITY OR TOWN ORDINANCE
-7-

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2004
FOR EXCESSIVE SPEED OR FAILURE TO OBEY A TRAFFIC CONTROL
DEVICE[, UNLESS, ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE LOCAL
AUTHORITY OR THE AGENCY OF THIS STATE HAS A SIGNED CONTRACT TO
OPERATE A PHOTO ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM].
[B. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 16-204, A LOCAL AUTHORITY
THAT HAS A SIGNED CONTRACT TO OPERATE A PHOTO ENFORCEMENT
SYSTEM PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION A OF THIS SECTION SHALL SEEK
APPROVAL OF THE VOTERS OF THE LOCAL AUTHORITY AT THE NEXT
GENERAL ELECTION IMMEDIATELY AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS
SECTION TO CONTINUE OPERATION OF THE PHOTO ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM.
C. IF THE LOCAL AUTHORITY DOES NOT RECEIVE VOTER
APPROVAL TO OPERATE A PHOTO ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION B OF THIS SECTION, THE LOCAL AUTHORITY SHALL CEASE
OPERATIONS OF THE PHOTO ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM WITHIN NINETY DAYS
AFTER THE GENERAL ELECTION IN WHICH THE VOTERS FAILED TO
APPROVE THE OPERATION OF THE PHOTO ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM.
D. IF THE LOCAL AUTHORITY RECEIVES VOTER APPROVAL TO
OPERATE A PHOTO ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION B OF
THIS SECTION, THE LOCAL AUTHORITY MAY CONTINUE TO OPERATE THE
PHOTO ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM FOR A PERIOD OF TEN YEARS AND ALL OF
THE FOLLOWING APPLY:
1. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 16-204, THE LOCAL AUTHORITY
SHALL SUBMIT TO THE LOCAL AUTHORITY'S VOTERS THE QUESTION OF
THE CONTINUED OPERATION OF THE PHOTO ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM FOR AN
ADDITIONAL TEN YEARS THAT SHALL BE PLACED ON THE GENERAL
ELECTION BALLOT FOR THE GENERAL ELECTION THAT IS HELD TEN
YEARS AFTER THE PREVIOUS VOTE THAT APPROVED THE OPERATION OF
THE PHOTO ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM.
2. IF THE LOCAL AUTHORITY RECEIVES VOTER APPROVAL AT
THE ELECTION PRESCRIBED BY PARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
LOCAL AUTHORITY MAY CONTINUE TO OPERATE THE PHOTO ENFORCEMENT
SYSTEM FOR A PERIOD OF TEN YEARS AND SHALL SUBMIT TO THE LOCAL
AUTHORITY'S VOTERS THE QUESTION OF THE CONTINUED OPERATION OF
THE PHOTO ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM EVERY TEN YEARS THEREAFTER AS
PRESCRIBED BY THIS SECTION.]
<<Sec. 6. Repeal
Section 28-1602, Arizona Revised Statutes, is
repealed.>>
Sec. 3. Legislative intent
Pursuant to section 41-1107, Arizona Revised Statutes,
the legislature intends to:
1. Keep the enforcement of the laws in this state in
the hands of trained law enforcement officers who are
authorized by the people of this state to enforce the laws.
2. Protect the citizens of this state from the abuses
that accompany the outsourcing of law enforcement to private,
for-profit entities.
-8-

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2004
3. Ensure that the purpose of law enforcement remains
to serve and protect and not to generate revenue for
governments.
2. The Secretary of State shall submit this proposition to the
voters at the next general election as provided by article IV, part 1,
section 1, Constitution of Arizona.
Enroll and engross to conform
Amend title to conform
TERESA MARTINEZ
HCR2004FloorMARTINEZ.docx
02/25/2026
3:39 PM
C: JR
130QKLLYN
-9-